New York, session 2025-2026, A870.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 130.53 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 192 2 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 130.53 Persistent sexual abuse. 4 A person is guilty of persistent sexual abuse when [he or she] such 5 person commits the crime of forcible touching, as defined in section 6 130.52 of this article, sexual abuse in the third degree, as defined in 7 section 130.55 of this article, or sexual abuse in the second degree, as 8 defined in section 130.60 of this article, and[, within the previous ten 9 year period, excluding any time during which such person was incarcerat- 10 ed for any reason,] has been convicted two or more times, in separate 11 criminal transactions for which sentence was imposed on separate occa- 12 sions, of forcible touching, as defined in section 130.52 of this arti- 13 cle, sexual abuse in the third degree as defined in section 130.55 of 14 this article, sexual abuse in the second degree, as defined in section 15 130.60 of this article, or any offense defined in this article, of which 16 the commission or attempted commission thereof is a felony. 17 Persistent sexual abuse is a class E felony. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 19 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02958-01-5